Maryland, session 2025, HB0156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–118.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0156*

HOUSE BILL 156
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “STUDENT OF THE FEMALE SEX” MEANS A STUDENT WHOSE
BIOLOGICAL SEX IS FEMALE.
(3) “STUDENT OF THE MALE SEX” MEANS A STUDENT WHOSE
BIOLOGICAL SEX IS MALE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOLS; AND
(2) NONPUBLIC HIGH SCHOOLS WHOSE STUDENT ATHLETES OR
ATHLETIC TEAMS COMPETE AGAINST STUDENT ATHLETES OR ATHLETIC TEAMS
FROM PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOLS IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) AN INTERSCHOLASTIC OR INTRAMURAL JUNIOR VARSITY OR
VARSITY ATHLETIC TEAM OR SPORT THAT IS SPONSORED BY A PUBLIC OR
NONPUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL SHALL BE EXPRESSLY DESIGNATED AS ONE OF THE
FOLLOWING BASED ON BIOLOGICAL SEX:
(I) A BOYS’, MALE, OR MEN’S TEAM OR SPORT;
(II) A GIRLS’, FEMALE, OR WOMEN’S TEAM OR SPORT; OR
(III) A COEDUCATIONAL OR MIXED TEAM OR SPORT.
(2) AN INTERSCHOLASTIC OR INTRAMURAL JUNIOR VARSITY OR
VARSITY ATHLETIC TEAM OR SPORT DESIGNATED FOR GIRLS, FEMALES, OR WOMEN
MAY NOT INCLUDE STUDENTS OF THE MALE SEX.
(D) A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY, A LICENSING OR ACCREDITING
ORGANIZATION, OR AN ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION OR ORGANIZATION MAY NOT ACCEPT
A COMPLAINT, CONDUCT AN INVESTIGATION, OR TAKE ANY OTHER ADVERSE ACTION
AGAINST A SCHOOL FOR MAINTAINING SEPARATE INTERSCHOLASTIC OR
INTRAMURAL JUNIOR VARSITY OR VARSITY ATHLETIC TEAMS OR SPORTS FOR
STUDENTS OF THE FEMALE SEX.
(E) (1) (I) A STUDENT WHO IS DEPRIVED OF AN ATHLETIC
OPPORTUNITY OR SUFFERS ANY DIRECT OR INDIRECT HARM AS A RESULT OF A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST THE SCHOOL THE

HOUSE BILL 156 3
STUDENT ATTENDS.
(II) A STUDENT WHO IS SUBJECT TO RETALIATION OR OTHER
ADVERSE ACTION BY A SCHOOL OR AN ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION OR ORGANIZATION
AS A RESULT OF REPORTING A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION TO AN EMPLOYEE OR
REPRESENTATIVE OF THE SCHOOL, ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION OR ORGANIZATION, OR
ANY STATE OR FEDERAL AGENCY WITH OVERSIGHT OF SCHOOLS IN THE STATE MAY
BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST THE SCHOOL OR ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION OR
ORGANIZATION.
(III) A SCHOOL THAT SUFFERS ANY DIRECT OR INDIRECT HARM
FROM A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY, A LICENSING OR ACCREDITING ORGANIZATION,
OR AN ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION OR ORGANIZATION AS A RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF
THIS SECTION MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST THE GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY,
LICENSING OR ACCREDITING ORGANIZATION, OR ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION OR
ORGANIZATION.
(2) A CIVIL ACTION INITIATED UNDER THIS SECTION MUST BE
INITIATED WITHIN 2 YEARS AFTER THE HARM OCCURRED.
(3) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PREVAILS IN A CIVIL ACTION UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY RECOVER:
(I) MONETARY DAMAGES, INCLUDING DAMAGES FOR ANY
PSYCHOLOGICAL, EMOTIONAL, AND PHYSICAL HARM SUFFERED;
(II) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS; AND
(III) ANY OTHER RELIEF, INCLUDING AN INJUNCTION, AS THE
COURT MAY DETERMINE APPROPRIATE.
(F) THIS SECTION MAY BE KNOWN AND CITED AS THE FAIRNESS IN GIRLS’
SPORTS ACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid for any reason in a
court of competent jurisdiction, the provision shall be construed to give the provision the
maximum effect permitted by law unless the provision is held to be absolutely invalid.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid for any reason in a
court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or any other
application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared severable.

HOUSE BILL 156
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.